Utah statutes.
30-4-5.   Rights and remedies -- Imprisonment of husband or wife.
Like rights and remedies shall be extended to either husband or wife on the
imprisonment of the other in the state prison under a sentence of one year or
more when suitable provision has not been made for the support of the one not
so imprisoned.
